Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska60-4,123.01
Fourteen-year-old person; operation permitted.

For purposes of driver training, any person who has attained or will attain the age of fourteen years on or before October 15 of the current year may operate a motor vehicle, other than an autocycle, upon the highways of this state if he or she is accompanied or, in the case of a motorcycle, other than an autocycle, or a moped, supervised at all times by a licensed operator who is a driver training instructor certified by the Commissioner of Education.

Laws 1991, LB 44, § 4;

Laws 2015, LB231, § 24;

Laws 2018, LB909, § 81.